lexc/noun/enhuoa.lexc
LEXICON AddNounat
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possat;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurat;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famat;

LEXICON Possat
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Famat;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Famat;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Famat;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Famat;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Famat;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Famat;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Famat;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Famat;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Famat;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Famat;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Famat;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Famat;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famat1;

LEXICON Plurat
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Genat;
                            Genat1;
       
LEXICON Famat
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genat;
                       Genat;
LEXICON Famat1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genat;
                       Genat1;

LEXICON Genat
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseat;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseat;
                       Caseat;
LEXICON Genat1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseat;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseat;
                       Caseat1;
 
LEXICON Caseat
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t      #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Caseat1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t      #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez11§t      #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNoun10
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss10;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur10;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam10;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Gen11;

LEXICON Poss10
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam10;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam10;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam10;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam10;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam10;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam10;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam10;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam10;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam10;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam10;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam10;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam10;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                                  Gen10;

LEXICON Plur10
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen10;
!                            Gen10;
        
LEXICON Fam10
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen10;
                       Gen10;

LEXICON Gen10
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case10;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case10;
                       Case10;

LEXICON Gen11
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case10;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case10;
                       Case11;
 
LEXICON Case10
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t      #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON Case11
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^at    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNoun20
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss20;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur20;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam21;
![stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Gen21;

LEXICON Poss20
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam20;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam20;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam20;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam20;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam20;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam20;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam20;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam20;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam20;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam20;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam20;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam20;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
!                                  Gen21;

LEXICON Plur20
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen20;
                            Gen21;
        
LEXICON Fam20
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen20;
                       Gen20;

LEXICON Fam21
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen20;
                       Gen21;

LEXICON Gen20
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case20;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case20;
                       Case20;

LEXICON Noun
adóarany AddNounat;
aggregátorház AddNoun10;
agyagmáz AddNoun20;
alabástromtál AddNounat;
alkalmazásváz AddNoun20;
alpinistatárs AddNoun10;
aranytál AddNounat;
aratóház AddNoun10;
aratóláz AddNoun20;
autóváz AddNoun20;
bagolyház AddNoun10;
behúzóvas AddNoun10;
betontál AddNounat;
betonváz AddNoun20;
biztosítékház AddNoun10;
bogárváz AddNoun20;
bovdenház AddNoun10;
bronztál AddNounat;
buszalváz AddNoun20;
bányaszékház AddNoun10;
bólétál AddNounat;
bölényház AddNoun10;
cinkmáz AddNoun20;
ciprustál AddNounat;
combvas AddNoun10;
csepegtetőtál AddNounat;
cseretárs AddNoun10;
csereváz AddNoun20;
csokoládémáz AddNoun20;
csárdatál AddNounat;
csúcskórház AddNoun10;
cölöpváz AddNoun20;
delfintárs AddNoun10;
desszertestál AddNounat;
disznóagyar AddNounat;
dizőzláz AddNoun20;
dologház AddNoun10;
dörzstál AddNounat;
edényház AddNoun10;
elefántagyar AddNounat;
emberház AddNoun10;
eozinmáz AddNoun20;
etetőtál AddNounat;
exporthűtőház AddNoun10;
ezüstváz AddNoun20;
farmertál AddNounat;
faágváz AddNoun20;
faáruház AddNoun10;
fehérarany AddNounat;
fenyőház AddNoun10;
fenékváz AddNoun20;
fogarany AddNounat;
fogdatárs AddNoun10;
formaváz AddNoun20;
fotóstál AddNounat;
frissítőház AddNoun10;
fénymáz AddNoun20;
férfimunkatárs AddNoun10;
fóliatál AddNounat;
főkórház AddNoun10;
főváz AddNoun20;
garázsház AddNoun10;
gipsztál AddNounat;
gulyástál AddNounat;
gyermekkórház AddNoun10;
gyönyörláz AddNoun20;
gyümölcsöstál AddNounat;
hajléktalankórház AddNoun10;
hajmosótál AddNounat;
hajóváz AddNoun20;
hangtál AddNounat;
harmonikaváz AddNoun20;
hibiszkuszház AddNoun10;
hosszváz AddNoun20;
háziasszonytárs AddNoun10;
hídváz AddNoun20;
hótál AddNounat;
imbisztál AddNounat;
inspektorház AddNoun10;
izomláz AddNoun20;
játékszínház AddNoun10;
jégkockatál AddNounat;
kameraváz AddNoun20;
kapitál AddNounat;
kaszavas AddNoun10;
keresztváz AddNoun20;
kerámiatál AddNounat;
kikötőház AddNoun10;
kismamaláz AddNoun20;
koldustál AddNounat;
komponensváz AddNoun20;
kondenzátortál AddNounat;
kontyvas AddNoun10;
korállváz AddNoun20;
kántorház AddNoun10;
kígyócsontváz AddNoun20;
kínálótál AddNounat;
közkórház AddNoun10;
labortál AddNounat;
lakkmáz AddNoun20;
levegőtál AddNounat;
leányhas AddNoun10;
lábastál AddNounat;
lábtartóváz AddNoun20;
lófejcsontváz AddNoun20;
lőcsvas AddNoun10;
magnóláz AddNoun20;
mamutagyar AddNounat;
medencecsontváz AddNoun20;
membránház AddNoun10;
mirigyláz AddNoun20;
mosdótál AddNounat;
mozaikarany AddNounat;
mozgatóváz AddNoun20;
mozgófényképszínház AddNoun10;
márványarany AddNounat;
mérceváz AddNoun20;
méretarany AddNounat;
múzeumház AddNoun10;
műarany AddNounat;
narancsmáz AddNoun20;
negyedarany AddNounat;
novíciustárs AddNoun10;
nyomorláz AddNoun20;
olimpialáz AddNoun20;
ollóvas AddNoun10;
olvasztótál AddNounat;
padlófénymáz AddNoun20;
paradicsomtál AddNounat;
parasztszínház AddNoun10;
petárdaláz AddNoun20;
pezsgőarany AddNounat;
pirítótál AddNounat;
plébániaegyház AddNoun10;
pogácsatál AddNounat;
politikaláz AddNoun20;
programváz AddNoun20;
punktál AddNounat;
páholyház AddNoun10;
rakétaláz AddNoun20;
regenerálóház AddNoun10;
reliefarany AddNounat;
rendezvényláz AddNoun20;
rozsdamáz AddNoun20;
ráktál AddNounat;
régiótárs AddNoun10;
rúdarany AddNounat;
salátástál AddNounat;
sebességláz AddNoun20;
smaragdláz AddNoun20;
sofőrtárs AddNoun10;
szatellittál AddNounat;
szegletvas AddNoun10;
szekrényváz AddNoun20;
sziklakórház AddNoun10;
szonettváz AddNoun20;
szérialáz AddNoun20;
színarany AddNounat;
színvonaltárs AddNoun10;
szűrőváz AddNoun20;
sörfőzőház AddNoun10;
sültestál AddNounat;
tallértál AddNounat;
tartalomváz AddNoun20;
tejüvegtál AddNounat;
teleház AddNoun10;
terepváz AddNoun20;
tisztítóvas AddNoun10;
tojótál AddNounat;
toronyláz AddNoun20;
tápszínház AddNoun10;
tömbarany AddNounat;
történetváz AddNoun20;
törzsház AddNoun10;
vallástárs AddNoun10;
vastál AddNounat;
veseláz AddNoun20;
vitamintál AddNounat;
vitatárs AddNoun10;
vízmérőház AddNoun10;
zsebláz AddNoun20;
zöldségestál AddNounat;
álmodozótárs AddNoun10;
ólomtál AddNounat;
óriásház AddNoun10;
öttusaláz AddNoun20;
őrtárs AddNoun10;
